Oklahoma, session 2025, SB712.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 75 O.S. 2021, Section 318, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 318. A. 1. Any party aggrieved by a final agency


order in an individual proceeding is entitled to certain, speedy,


adequate, and complete judicial review thereof pursuant to the


provisions of this section and Sections 319, 320, 321, 322, and 323


of this title.


2. This section shall not prevent resort to other means of


review, redress, relief, or trial de novo, available because of


constitutional provisions.


3. Neither a motion for new trial nor an application for


rehearing shall be prerequisite to secure judicial review.

Req. No. 1450 Page 1


4. In interpreting a statute or administrative rule, the


reviewing court shall not defer to an administrative agency’s


interpretation of such statute or administrative rule and shall


interpret such statute or agency rule de novo.


B. 1. The judicial review prescribed by this section for final


agency orders, as to agencies whose final agency orders are made


subject to review, under constitutional or statutory provisions, by


appellate proceedings in the Supreme Court of Oklahoma, shall be


afforded by such proceedings taken in accordance with the procedure


and under the conditions otherwise provided by law, but subject to


the applicable provisions of Sections 319 through 324 of this title,


and the rules of the Supreme Court.


2. In all other instances, proceedings for review shall be


instituted by filing a petition, in the district court of the county


in which the party seeking review resides or at the option of such


party where the property interest affected is situated, naming as


respondents only the agency, such other party or parties in the


administrative proceeding as may be named by the petitioner or as


otherwise may be allowed by law, within thirty (30) days after the


appellant is notified of the final agency order as provided in


Section 312 of this title.


C. Copies of the petition shall be delivered in person or


mailed, postage prepaid, to the agency and all other parties of


record, and proof of such delivery or mailing shall be filed in the

Req. No. 1450 Page 2


court within ten (10) days after the filing of the petition. Any


party not named as a respondent in the petition is entitled to


respond within ten (10) days of receipt of service. The court, in


its discretion, may permit other interested persons to intervene.


D. In any proceedings for review brought by a party aggrieved


by a final agency order:


1. The agency whose final agency order was made subject to


review may be entitled to recover against such aggrieved party any


court costs, witness fees, and reasonable attorney fees if the court


determines that the proceeding brought by the party is frivolous or


was brought to delay the effect of said the final agency order.


2. The party aggrieved by the final agency order may be


entitled to recover against such agency any court costs, witness


fees, and reasonable attorney fees if the court determines that the


proceeding brought by the agency is frivolous.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1450 RD 1/19/2025 5:41:50 AM













Req. No. 1450 Page 3